Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2043YH (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 291 Section 1. Section 321.109, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The annual registration fee calculated 3 under this section or any other provision of this chapter shall 4 be reduced for a disabled veteran not otherwise exempt under 5 section 321.105, subsection 5, by a percentage equal to the 6 veteranâs service-related disability rating, as determined 7 by the United States department of veterans affairs, for one 8 vehicle owned by the disabled veteran. The annual fee imposed 9 under section 321.34 for a special or personalized registration 10 plate for the vehicle, if any, shall also be reduced by the 11 same percentage. 12